Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.901

Effective date—1984 c 270 as amended by 1985 c 455.

Sections 12, 13, 14, 15, and 16, chapter 270, Laws of 1984 as amended by sections 13, 14, 15, 16, and 17 of this 1985 act shall take effect on July 1, 1986, and the remainder of chapter 270, Laws of 1984 shall take effect on July 1, 1985.

[ 2001 c 222 s 23. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 20; 1984 c 270 s 21.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.